Utah statutes.
20A-13-301.   Presidential elections -- Effect of vote.
(1) (a)  Each registered political party shall choose persons to act as
presidential electors and to fill vacancies in the office of presidential
electors for their party's candidates for President and Vice President
according to the procedures established in their bylaws.
(b)  The person designated as liaison with the lieutenant governor's office
shall transmit to the lieutenant governor the names and addresses of the
persons selected by the political party as the party's presidential electors.
(2)  The highest number of votes cast for a political party's president and
vice president candidates elects the presidential electors selected by that
political party.
